District of Columbia statutes.
24-231.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Bureau of Justice Assistance Private Sector Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program”, or “PIE Program”, means the federal grant-in-aid program administered by the Bureau of Justice Assistance, United States Department of Justice, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 3741-3761, and participation in which by the states or the District of Columbia affords an exemption from the general federal prohibition against open market sale of prisoner-produced goods, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 1761(c).

(2)

“Correctional facility” means any building or group of buildings and concomitant services operated as a single management unit by the District of Columbia Department of Corrections for the purpose of housing and providing services to persons ordered confined pending trial or upon conviction and sentencing for a violation of law.

(3)

“Department” means the District of Columbia Department of Corrections.

(4)

“Director” means the Director of the District of Columbia Department of Corrections.

(5)

“Joint venture” means a production unit in or part of a prison industry, that:

(A)

Employs sentenced prisoners;

(B)

Is wholly or partly owned, operated, or managed by a joint venture partner that is a private-sector employer; and

(C)

Sells goods or services in the open market, including in interstate and foreign commerce, or to the federal government, the District of Columbia, or any state or political subdivision of a state.

(6)

“Prison industries” means an organized plan, including equipment and facilities, for the production and distribution of goods or services on the grounds of a correctional facility to aid disciplinary and rehabilitative goals of the prison system.

(7)

“Prison Industries Fund” means the revolving fund established by § 24-231.02.

(8)

“Prisoner” means any person who is confined to an adult correctional facility.

(9)

“Private-sector employer” means:

(A)

Any person who, for compensation, uses the services of an individual; and

(B)

Any administrator, agent, assignee, conservator, executor, liquidator, officer, receiver, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, or other representative of a person described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

(10)

“Substance abuse” means any pattern of pathological use of alcohol or other drug that causes impairment in social or occupational functioning, or that produces physiological dependency as evidenced by physical tolerance or by physical symptoms when it is withdrawn.

(11)

“Washington, D.C., region” means the geographic area that encompasses the District of Columbia and adjacent portions of the State of Maryland and the Commonwealth of Virginia.

May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 2, 43 DCR 1179
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 19 of D.C. Law 11-117 provided that, in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 15 of Title 1, the Mayor shall issue rules to implement this subchapter.
1981 Ed., § 24-458.1.
This section is referenced in § 32-1503 and § 51-101.